Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 13 SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES DISTRICT
32-13-107. Sales and use tax imposed - collection - administration of tax - use - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-105, the board has the power to levy such uniform sales and use taxes throughout the district created in section 32-13-104 upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales and use tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that beginning July 1, 2016, such sales and use tax shall not be levied or collected on the sale or use of aviation fuel.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes approved by the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-105 shall expire July 1, 1996, unless the district is authorized to continue to levy and collect the sales and use taxes by the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of said section.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the authority of the district to continue to levy and collect the sales and use taxes approved by the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-105 shall expire on the date specified in the question submitted to the registered electors unless the district is subsequently authorized to continue to levy and collect the sales and use taxes by the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of said section.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of said sales and use tax shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as that for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the state sales and use tax imposed under article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., including, without limitation, the retention by a vendor of the percentage of the amount remitted to cover the vendor's expense in the collection and remittance of said tax as provided in section 39-26-105, C.R.S. The executive director shall make monthly distributions of such sales and use tax collections to the district. The district shall pay the net incremental cost incurred by the department of revenue in the administration and collection of such sales and use taxes; except that in no event shall the district pay in any given fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 1994, more than an amount equal to the amount paid by the district in the 1993-94 fiscal year, as adjusted in accordance with changes in the consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area. The department may make expenditures for such costs subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

The proceeds of such sales and use tax collections shall be used by the board to assist scientific and cultural facilities within the district. The board may deduct from the proceeds of the sales and use tax collections amounts necessary to cover the costs incurred by the district for the administration of such proceeds; except that the amount deducted for such purpose shall not exceed one and fifty one-hundredths percent of the sales and use tax revenues annually collected up to and including thirty-eight million dollars and one and fifty one-hundredths percent of the sales and use tax revenues annually collected in excess of thirty-eight million dollars. The board may also deduct from the proceeds of the sales and use tax collections an amount necessary to pay the district's actual or anticipated reasonable costs related to a coordinated election. After making the deductions allowed in this subsection (3), the board shall distribute the remaining proceeds from the sales and use tax collections to scientific and cultural facilities as follows:

Upon voter approval of the levy and collection of the sales and use tax specified in section 32-13-105 (5)(a)(I) or (10)(a)(I), as applicable, the sales and use tax revenues levied and collected by the district shall be distributed annually by the board as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), ninety-five percent of said sales and use tax revenues shall be distributed for annual operating expenses as follows:

Twenty-four and fifty one-hundredths percent shall be distributed to the Denver museum of nature and science;

Twenty and thirty-three one-hundredths percent shall be distributed to the Denver art museum;

Twenty-four and twenty-four one-hundredths percent shall be distributed to the Denver zoological gardens;

Thirteen and twenty-five one-hundredths percent shall be distributed to the Denver botanical gardens;

Seventeen and sixty-eight one-hundredths percent shall be distributed to the Denver center for the performing arts;

After the first five years said sales and use tax is levied and collected, up to five percent of said sales and use tax revenues specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) may be distributed by the board to the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver art museum, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver botanical gardens, and the Denver center for the performing arts pursuant to a formula adopted by the board. Such formula shall be binding on the board and may only be modified every five years thereafter.

Up to five percent of said sales and use tax revenues may be distributed by the board to the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver art museum, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver botanical gardens, and the Denver center for the performing arts in such amounts as the board may determine appropriate based upon one or more of the following factors: Regional impact, accessibility, quality, need, enhanced or innovative programs, and collaboration with the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver art museum, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver botanical gardens, or the Denver center for the performing arts or with scientific and cultural facilities that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) or subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 481, 2, effective January 1, 1996.)

Any moneys not distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a) shall be distributed at the same time and in the same manner as other moneys are annually distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a).

Upon voter approval of the levy and collection of the sales and use tax specified in section 32-13-105 (5)(a)(II) or (10)(a)(II), as applicable, the sales and use tax revenues levied and collected by the district shall be distributed annually by the board for annual operating expenses as follows:

Ninety-five percent of said sales and use tax revenues shall be distributed to scientific and cultural facilities within the district that are not receiving moneys pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) and that meet the following criteria:

Any such facility shall be a nonprofit organization that has a determination letter in effect from the internal revenue service confirming that the organization meets the requirements of section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of visual arts, performing arts, cultural history, natural history, or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board, or shall be an agency of local government that has such primary purpose.

Any such facility shall have its principal office within the district, shall conduct the majority of its activities within the state of Colorado, and shall principally benefit the residents of the district. In addition, any such facility shall demonstrate its regional service and impact according to criteria established by the board.

For any facility that applies to receive district moneys prior to July 1, 2006, such facility shall have had an annual operating income of more than seven hundred thousand dollars for the previous year as adjusted for the annual change in the consumer price index as specified in this subsection (3)(b)(I)(C). For any facility that applies to receive district moneys on or after July 1, 2006, such facility shall have had an annual operating income of more than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars for the previous year as adjusted for the annual change in the consumer price index as specified in this subsection (3)(b)(I)(C); except that any facility that qualified to receive a distribution pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) on or before June 30, 2006, shall be subject to the one million two hundred fifty thousand dollar threshold as adjusted for the annual change in the consumer price index as specified in this subsection (3)(b)(I)(C), as of July 1, 2009. For distributions made pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) in 1996 and in each year thereafter, the board shall annually adjust the amount specified in this subsection (3)(b)(I)(C), as applicable, in accordance with the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for the previous year for the Denver-Boulder-Greeley consolidated metropolitan statistical area for all urban consumers and all goods, as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics. For distributions made pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) in 2017 and in each year thereafter, the board shall annually adjust the amount specified in this subsection (3)(b)(I)(C), as applicable, for the percentage change between the average Denver-Aurora-Lakewood consumer price index, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the calendar year three years prior to the year of distribution and the average Denver-Aurora-Lakewood consumer price index, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the calendar year two years prior to the year of distribution.

Beginning January 1, 2017, a facility must have been in existence, operating, and providing service to the public for at least seven years as a nonprofit institutional organization under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, prior to applying for eligibility to receive district moneys for the first time. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph (D), "operating" means engaged in some form of activity with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of visual arts, performing arts, cultural history, natural history, or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subparagraph (I), for multiple facilities that were created by a local government and that have the same taxpayer identification number or federal employee identification number, no more than two facilities per taxpayer identification number or federal employee identification number are eligible to receive a distribution of revenues pursuant to this paragraph (b) in any fiscal year.

Distribution of moneys pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be based upon a formula to be applied annually that gives a specific weight to the annual operating income of such facilities, the annual paid attendance at such facilities, and the annual documented free attendance at such facilities. The board shall determine the weight to be given to each factor, and such determination shall be binding on the board. The board may modify the weight to be given to each factor not more than once every two years.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

Up to five percent of said sales and use tax revenues may be distributed by the board to the scientific and cultural facilities that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) in such amounts as the board determines appropriate based upon one or more of the following factors: Regional impact, accessibility, quality, need, enhanced or innovative programs, and collaboration with the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver art museum, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver botanical gardens, or the Denver center for the performing arts or with scientific and cultural facilities that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) or subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 481, § 2, effective January 1, 1996.)

Any moneys not distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b) shall be placed by the board in an interest-bearing account with a federally insured bank or savings and loan association located in the state of Colorado. Such moneys shall remain in such account until the board, in its discretion, determines to distribute such moneys at the same time and in the same manner as other moneys are annually distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b).

Prior to July 1, 2006, notwithstanding any other provision, a scientific and cultural facility that qualifies to receive moneys pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) shall not receive in any given year more than thirty-three percent of the total amount of sales and use tax revenues distributed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) in such year. If the amount of moneys received by any scientific and cultural facility in any given year exceeds the allowable amount, the scientific and cultural facility shall refund to the district the amount of moneys in excess of the allowable amount.

On and after July 1, 2006, notwithstanding any other provision, a scientific and cultural facility that qualifies to receive moneys pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) for the first time prior to July 1, 2006, shall not receive in any given year more than twenty-five percent of the total amount of sales and use tax revenues distributed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) in such year. If the amount of moneys received by any scientific and cultural facility in any given year exceeds the allowable amount, the scientific and cultural facility shall refund to the district the amount of moneys in excess of the allowable amount.

On and after July 1, 2006, notwithstanding any other provision, a scientific and cultural facility that qualifies to receive moneys pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) for the first time on or after July 1, 2006, shall not receive more than fifteen percent of the total amount of sales and use tax revenues distributed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) in the first year of distribution, twenty percent of such total amount in the second year of distribution, and twenty-five percent of such total amount in the third and any subsequent year of distribution. If the amount of moneys received by any scientific and cultural facility in any given year exceeds the allowable amount, the scientific and cultural facility shall refund to the district the amount of moneys in excess of the allowable amount.

Upon voter approval of the levy and collection of the sales and use tax specified in section 32-13-105 (5)(a)(III) or (10)(a)(III), as applicable, the sales and use tax revenues levied and collected by the district shall be distributed annually by the board for annual operating expenses as follows:

Ninety-five percent of said sales and use tax revenues collected in each county comprising the district shall be distributed by the board to scientific and cultural facilities within such county pursuant to the provisions of the plan submitted by each county cultural council as specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c). Said moneys shall be distributed to scientific and cultural facilities within the district which are not receiving moneys pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) and which meet the following criteria:

Any such facility shall be a nonprofit organization that has a determination letter in effect from the internal revenue service confirming that the organization meets the requirements of section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of visual arts, performing arts, cultural history, natural history, or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board, or shall be an agency of local government that has such primary purpose.

Any such facility shall have its principal office within the district, shall conduct the majority of its activities within the state of Colorado, and shall principally benefit the residents of the district.

Beginning January 1, 2017, a facility must have been in existence, operating, and providing service to the public for at least five years as a nonprofit institutional organization under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, prior to applying for eligibility to receive district moneys for the first time. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph (C), "operating" means engaged in some form of activity with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of visual arts, performing arts, cultural history, natural history, or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subparagraph (I), for multiple facilities that were created by a local government and that have the same taxpayer identification number or federal employee identification number, no more than two facilities per taxpayer identification number or federal employee identification number are eligible to receive a distribution of revenues pursuant to this paragraph (c) in any fiscal year.

The county cultural council of each county comprising the district shall submit to the board an annual plan specifying the distribution of such revenues as provided for in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) to scientific and cultural facilities in such county that meet the criteria set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c). In creating such plan, a county cultural council may take into account an organization's financial and organizational capacity to expend tax dollars to serve the public and achieve the mission of the organization, and may give priority to scientific and cultural facilities within such county that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3). Such plans submitted by such county cultural councils to the board shall be binding upon the board.

Up to five percent of said sales and use tax revenues collected in each county comprising the district may be distributed by the board to the scientific and cultural facilities that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) as the board may determine appropriate based upon one or more of the following factors: Accessibility, quality, need, enhanced or innovative programs, financial and organizational capacity to expend tax dollars to serve the public and achieve the mission of the organization, and collaboration with the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver art museum, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver botanical gardens, or the Denver center for the performing arts or with scientific and cultural facilities that qualify to receive moneys pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) or subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c). Any distribution made pursuant to this subparagraph (III) shall be based upon the provisions of the plan submitted by each county cultural council as required by subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 481, § 2, effective January 1, 1996.)

Any moneys not distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c) shall be placed by the board in an interest-bearing account with a federally insured bank or savings and loan association located in the state of Colorado. Such moneys shall remain in such account until the board, in its discretion, determines to distribute such moneys at the same time and in the same manner as other moneys are annually distributed pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c).

No scientific and cultural facility which receives moneys pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (3) shall use or expend such moneys for the acquisition, physical preservation, or restoration of any historic building, structure, or site.

Upon any extension of the sales and use taxes levied and collected by the district in accordance with section 32-13-105, the amount of sales and use tax proceeds expended and distributed by the district in any given year shall not exceed the amount specified in the ballot question for the current fiscal year and shall not exceed the amount specified in the ballot question as adjusted for inflation plus annual local growth for each fiscal year after the current fiscal year. For purposes of this subsection (4), "inflation" has the meaning set forth in section 20 of article X of the state constitution and in section 24-77-102 (8), C.R.S., and "local growth" has the meaning set forth in section 20 of said article X. Whenever the amount of sales and use tax proceeds collected in any fiscal year pursuant to this article exceeds the permissible amount to be expended and distributed, the provisions of section 20 of said article X governing tax refunds shall apply.

Pursuant to section 1-7-116, C.R.S., and any agreement enacted pursuant thereto, the district shall pay a county or a city and county for its share of the expenses associated with a coordinated election; except that the amount the district is required to pay for any coordinated election shall be limited to and not exceed the district's reasonable costs related to a coordinated election.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1257, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 319, § 5, effective March 29; (1), (2), IP(3), IP(3)(a), IP(3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), IP(3)(a)(IV), IP(3)(b), IP(3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(II)(B), (3)(b)(III), IP(3)(b)(IV), IP(3)(c), IP(3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(III), and IP(3)(c)(IV) amended and (4) added, p. 472, § 3, effective March 31; (3)(d) added, p. 484, § 3, effective March 31; (3)(a)(III) to (3)(a)(V), (3)(b)(I)(C), (3)(b)(I)(D), (3)(b)(III) to (3)(b)(V), (3)(c)(III) to (3)(c)(V) amended and (3)(b.5) added, p. 481, § 2, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 99:

(1)(a) amended, p. 982, § 6, effective May 28; (1)(a) amended, p. 1357, § 7, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1041, § 8, effective July 1; (3)(a), IP(3)(b), (3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(III), (3)(b.5), IP(3)(c), IP(3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(I)(A), and (3)(c)(III) amended and (3)(c)(I)(C) added, p. 291, § 8, effective July 1, 2006.

L. 2005:

(3)(a)(I)(A), (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), (3)(b)(III)(A), and (3)(c)(III) amended, p. 779, § 67, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

IP(3) amended and (5) added, p. 1780, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2009:

IP(1)(a) amended, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1849, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 13-1272), ch. 337, p. 1965, § 3, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1)(a), IP(3), IP(3)(a), IP(3)(b), IP(3)(c), IP(3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(II), and (3)(c)(III) amended, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 395, § 5, effective April 29; (3)(b)(I), (3)(c)(I)(A), and (3)(c)(I)(C) amended and (3)(c)(I)(D) added, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 395, § 5, effective January 1, 2017; (3)(b)(II) amended, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 395, § 5, effective January 1, 2018; (3)(a)(I) amended, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 395, § 5, effective July 1, 2018.

L. 2018:

(3)(b)(I)(C) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1716, § 68, effective May 29.

32-13-107.5. Legislative declaration - submission to voters - severability.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the extension of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 32-13-105 are extensions of expiring taxes subject to the provisions of section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state constitution and are subject to voter approval; that the tax proceeds resulting from the taxes which the voters may be asked to extend are subject to the fiscal year spending limit of the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district imposed by section 20 (7)(b) of said article X; that said constitutional provision limits the growth of district revenues by restricting the increase of fiscal year spending to the rate of inflation plus annual local growth; that the ballot questions specified in section 32-13-105 fully disclose to the voters that the amount of tax proceeds resulting from the taxes which they may be asked to extend will be subject to increase after the current fiscal year based upon the factors of inflation and annual local growth specified in section 20 (7)(b) of said article X; and that this disclosure in said ballot questions is for informational purposes only as the growth in the amount of tax proceeds is permitted to occur only at the rate permitted by section 20 (7)(b) of said article X.

The purpose of this article is to secure a dependable source of revenue to be used by the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district to assist scientific and cultural facilities within said district as set forth in this article and to provide for a source of revenue which will grow in proportion to the expanding financial needs of scientific and cultural facilities. However, in the event that it is found by a court of competent jurisdiction that the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution do not permit an extension of an expiring tax which incorporates such growth in revenues, the portions of the ballot questions set forth in section 32-13-105 which provide for an adjustment of permissible revenues based on inflation and annual local growth shall be deemed to be severable from the remainder of such ballot questions and that the valid portions of the ballot questions are not so essentially and inseparably connected with or dependent upon the invalid portions that the valid portions would not have been enacted without the invalid portions.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 475, § 4, effective March 31.

32-13-108. Petition or resolution for formation and levy of tax - petition or resolution for extension of tax - verification of signatures - election.

A scientific and cultural facilities district may include a portion of one county, an entire county, or areas contained within multiple counties of the state; except that no county shall include more than one scientific and cultural facilities district composed of areas located solely within that county.

The formation of a scientific and cultural facilities district other than the district created in section 32-13-104 shall be initiated by a petition signed by registered electors of each unincorporated area of a county and of each area within a municipality that is to be included in the proposed scientific and cultural facilities district in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in each area for all candidates for the office of governor at the last preceding general election, by resolution adopted by the board, or by resolution of each board adopted pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement entered into by the boards of county commissioners of the county or counties in which a scientific and cultural facilities district is proposed.

Such petition or resolution shall state that the proposed scientific and cultural facilities district would levy and collect for a period of time not to exceed ten years a uniform sales tax throughout the geographical area of the district at a rate not to exceed thirty one-hundredths of one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the county in which the transaction or other incident occurs, pursuant to the provisions of article 2 of title 29, C.R.S.

Such petition or resolution shall be filed with the board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the proposed scientific and cultural facilities district would be formed at least three months before the general election or the election held on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year, whichever is applicable, at which it may be voted upon.

The petition or resolution for the formation of a scientific and cultural facilities district shall state:

The name proposed for the scientific and cultural facilities district; and

A description of the geographical area to be included in the scientific and cultural facilities district sufficient to enable a property owner to determine whether his or her property lies within the district.

The petition or resolution for the formation of a scientific and cultural facilities district may state any formula or criteria concerning the distribution of sales tax collections pursuant to section 32-13-110 (3); including criteria that scientific and cultural facilities must meet in order to receive moneys from the district which are in addition to the criteria specified in section 32-13-110 (3)(a) and (3)(b). If the petition or resolution does include such formula or criteria and the registered electors voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question of creation of the district and the levy of the tax specified in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, then such formula or criteria contained in such petition or resolution shall be binding upon the board.

The petition or resolution for the formation of a scientific and cultural facilities district shall state the month, day, and year on which the authority of the scientific and cultural facilities district to levy and collect the sales tax shall expire.

(2.5) (a) For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution, the question of whether the board of a district created pursuant to this section shall be authorized to continue the levy and collection of the sales tax throughout the district upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the county in which the transaction or other incident occurs, pursuant to the provisions of article 2 of title 29, C.R.S., for a period of time not to exceed ten years from the date upon which the authority of the board to levy and collect the sales taxes is scheduled to expire shall be initiated by a petition signed by the registered electors of the district in a number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the each incorporated and unincorporated area included within the district for all candidates for the office of governor at the last preceding general election or initiated by a resolution adopted by the board of the scientific and cultural facilities district.

Such petition or resolution shall state the name of the scientific and cultural facilities district and that the district would continue to levy and collect a uniform sales tax throughout the geographical area of the district at a rate not to exceed thirty one-hundredths of one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the county in which the transaction or other incident occurs, pursuant to the provisions of article 2 of title 29, C.R.S., for a period of time not to exceed ten years from the date upon which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales tax is scheduled to expire.

Such petition or resolution shall be filed with the board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the scientific and cultural facilities district is located at least three months before the general election or the election held on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year, whichever is applicable, at which it may be voted upon.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 476, 6, effective March 31, 1994.)

(3.5) Upon the filing of any petition pursuant to this section, each affected board of county commissioners shall transmit the petition to its county clerk and recorder for verification of signatures. Each county clerk and recorder shall verify the signatures of registered electors from areas within such county within thirty days of receiving the petition. Any county clerk and recorder who declares that the petition appears not to have a sufficient number of signatures from areas within a county shall grant a fifteen-day extension to the petitioners to cure the insufficiency by filing an addendum to the original petition for the purpose of offering the number of signatures as will cure the insufficiency. No addendum offered as a cure shall be considered unless the addendum conforms to the same requirements imposed upon the original petition and unless filed with the county clerk and recorder within the fifteen-day period after the insufficiency is declared. Any protest regarding the verification or sufficiency of signatures on the petition shall be made pursuant to section

1-40-118

, C.R.S., and any hearing or further appeals regarding such protest shall be held in accordance with section

1-40-119

, C.R.S.

If a petition or resolution for the formation of a scientific and cultural facilities district and the levy and collection of the sales tax satisfies the requirements specified in this section, each affected board of county commissioners shall submit, in identical form determined by intergovernmental agreement, the question of the organization of the scientific and cultural facilities district at the next general election or election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, whichever is held first after the filing of the petition or resolution. Any question submitted shall comply with the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as applicable.

If a petition or resolution for the extension of the authority to levy and collect a sales tax by the scientific and cultural facilities district satisfies the requirements specified in this section, the question of whether the scientific and cultural facilities district shall be authorized to continue the levy and collection of sales tax throughout the district shall be submitted at the next general election or election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, whichever is held first after the filing of the petition or resolution. Any question submitted shall comply with the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as applicable.

If at any such election a majority of the registered electors of the proposed district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question of the creation of the district and the levy of the tax specified in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, then the district shall come into existence, and such tax may be levied and collected as provided in this article. If a majority of the registered electors of said area vote "No" on the question, the district shall not come into existence.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question authorizing the district to continue the levy and collection of the sales tax specified in subsection (1) of this section until the date specified in the question, then such sales tax shall continue to be levied, collected, and distributed as provided for in this article until said date.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1515, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 991, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (2), (3), (4), and (5) amended and (2.5) and (3.5) added, p. 476, § 6, effective March 31.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 358, § 2, effective April 20.

32-13-109. Board of directors - powers and duties.

A district created pursuant to section 32-13-108 shall be governed by a board of directors which shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. A director appointed pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be appointed to serve a term of three years, but no director shall serve more than two succeeding terms. Any such director may be removed at any time during his term by the appointing authority.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held. Meetings shall be held within the district and shall be open to the public.

To adopt and amend rules of procedure;

To select a chairman;

To hire such staff as may be necessary to assist the board in its duties;

To enter into contracts including but not limited to contracts for the provision of cultural services for the district;

To sue and be sued;

To administer and use moneys collected pursuant to section 32-13-110, in accordance with the guidelines specified in section 32-13-110.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1262, § 1, effective July 1.